Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2376
Local hospital district; excess deposit; security requirements.

The secretary-treasurer may deposit in any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution of the local hospital district in which he or she is secretary-treasurer amounts in excess of amounts authorized in section 77-2375 when (1) the depository secures the deposits by giving security as provided in the Public Funds Deposit Security Act and (2) the same is approved by a formal resolution of the board of directors. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1994, LB 1118, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 54;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 76.

Public Funds Deposit Security Act, see section 77-2386.